Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7001
Act, how cited.

Sections 44-7001 to 44-7013 shall be known and may be cited as the Health Care Professional Credentialing Verification Act.

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 26.